test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-shosse_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - шоссе: # Noun 'a highway'
     шоссе+N+Sg+Nom: шоссе
     шоссе+N+Sg+Gen: шоссен
     шоссе+N+Sg+Acc: шоссем
     шоссе+N+Sg+Com: шоссеге
     шоссе+N+Sg+Dat: шосселӓн
     шоссе+N+Sg+Ine: шоссештӹ
     шоссе+N+Sg+Ill: [шоссеш, шоссешкӹ]
     шоссе+N+Sg+Lat: шоссеш
     шоссе+N+Sg+Cmpr: шосселӓ
     шоссе+N+Sg+Abe: шосседе

     шоссе+N+Pl+Nom: шоссевлӓ

     шоссе+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: шоссем
     шоссе+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: шоссет
     шоссе+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: шоссежӹ
     шоссе+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: шоссенӓ
     шоссе+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: шосседӓ
     шоссе+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: шоссештӹ
